California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 and are needed for the individual to retain the employment.

(c) For the purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), “program activity” includes, but is not limited to, any welfare-to-work activity, orientation, appraisal, assessment, job search, job club, domestic violence services, court appearances, housing searches and classes, homeless support programs, shelter participation requirements, eviction proceedings, mental health services, including therapy or personal counseling, home visiting, drug and substance abuse services, parenting classes, and medical or education-related appointments for the participant or their dependents.

(d) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(e) The changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026, or, if automation is necessary, the later of July 1, 2026, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11320.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 12.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11323.21.

(a) (1) A CalWORKs eligible individual who provides the county with evidence that the individual is participating in an educational activity full time at a publicly funded or nonprofit postsecondary educational institution in accordance with Section 11322.84 shall receive a payment of five hundred dollars ($500) for each semester or three hundred fifty dollars ($350) for each quarter, and a CalWORKs eligible individual who provides the county with evidence that the individual is participating in an educational activity part time at a
 publicly funded or nonprofit postsecondary educational institution, in accordance with Section 11322.84, shall receive a payment of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each semester or one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175) for each quarter, for the purpose of paying costs associated with attending the publicly funded or nonprofit postsecondary educational institution 10 days before the beginning of the academic semester or quarter.

(2) A summer session shall be deemed to be a quarter for purposes of this section.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the amounts set forth in subdivision (a)
 shall be considered a standard payment for books and college supplies.

(c) A recipient may request reimbursement for the actual costs for the purpose of paying costs associated with attending the publicly funded or nonprofit postsecondary educational institution pursuant to Section 11323.2 if the recipient provides verification of expenses that exceed the applicable amount set forth in subdivision (a) for books and college supplies that are required for the classes in which the individual is enrolled. The county shall issue payment within 20 days of the recipient’s request.

(d) A county may elect to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) in the form of a book voucher or other means of payment to a store or stores that carry the books required for the recipient. The county
 may only exercise this option if the county makes all required books available to the recipient at least 10 days before the start of the semester, summer session, or quarter to ensure that the participant has the required books on the first day of class.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations.

(2) The
 department shall adopt emergency regulations no later than January 1, 2023. The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as, or substantially equivalent to, an emergency regulation previously adopted under this section.

(3) The initial adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to this section and one readoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency
 regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations shall be adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 447, Sec. 2.   (SB 768)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11323.25.

(a) In addition to its authority under subdivision (b) of Section 11323.2, if provided in a county plan, the county may continue to provide welfare-to-work services to former participants who became ineligible for CalWORKs benefits because they became employed under Section 11322.64. The county may provide these services for up to the first 12 months of employment, to the extent they are not available from other sources and are needed for the individual to retain the subsidized employment.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 11) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 25, Sec. 12.   (AB 1603)   Effective June 27, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11323.3.

(a) An applicant for, or a recipient of, CalWORKs benefits shall be informed of the availability of childcare services upon enrollment in the CalWORKs program, and at later times when a participant expresses to the county a need for childcare. The county shall verify if childcare is needed to participate in a program activity, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 11323.2, and, if needed, that childcare services are authorized and that the participant has secured appropriate childcare prior to requiring a participant to participate in any mandatory activity. Verification that childcare has been secured may be established by the participant, the childcare contractor, or the childcare provider.

(b) An applicant for, or a recipient of, CalWORKs benefits shall be
 provided written notice, both at the time of application and when they sign an original or amended welfare-to-work plan, of the availability of paid childcare as provided in Section 11323.2. The notice shall inform applicants and recipients of all of the following:

(1) Paid childcare is available to allow them to be employed or participate in welfare-to-work activities or program activities, as defined in Section 11323.2.

(2) The name and contact information for the local childcare resource and referral program. 

(3) Assistance in finding and choosing a childcare provider is available.

(4) A recipient is required to inform the county welfare department of the recipient’s need for paid childcare as soon as that need arises.

(5) The recipient is required to request a childcare subsidy from the county within 30 days from the first day childcare services are received from each different provider, to be fully reimbursed for childcare services.

(c) Commencing January 1, 2021, or the date that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this subdivision, whichever date is later, the written notice described in subdivision (b) shall additionally be provided to the recipient at the time of orientation, when they are assigned to a program activity, when they report new or increased participation in a program activity, and when they report new earned income or employment.

(d) The written notice described in subdivision (b) shall be provided in compliance with the Dymally-Alatorre Bilingual Services Act
 (Chapter 17.5 (commencing with Section 7290) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(e) An applicant for, or recipient of, CalWORKs benefits shall be asked to sign a copy of the written notice acknowledging that they have been informed of and received the notice. The signed notice shall be retained in the client’s file and a signed original or copy shall be given to the client.

(f) No payment shall be made for childcare services provided pursuant to Section 8351 of the Education Code more than 30 days prior to the recipient’s initial request for payment for the childcare service from that provider, when the recipient received the written notice described in subdivisions (b) and (d).

(g) The department shall work with counties and other stakeholders to do both of the following:

 (1) Modify applicable CalWORKs notices and forms about childcare to include the information described in subdivision (b).

(2) Make the modified notices and forms available at times in addition to those specified in subdivision (b), such as at the time of orientation, when and where possible and appropriate.

(h) (1) The department shall develop regulations to implement this section.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) and the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement the amendments made to this section by the act that added this paragraph by all-county letter or similar directive until
 regulations are adopted.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 49) by Stats. 2019, Ch. 414, Sec. 4.   (AB 121)   Effective October 2, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11323.4.

(a) Payments for supportive services, as described in Section 11323.2, shall be advanced to the participant, whenever necessary, and when desired by the participant, so that the participant need not use the participant’s funds to pay for these services. Payments for childcare services shall be made in accordance with Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 8350) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of the Education Code.

(b) The county welfare department shall take all reasonable steps necessary to promptly correct any overpayment or underpayment of supportive services payments to a recipient or a service provider, including, but not limited to, all cases involving fraud and abuse, consistent with procedures developed by the department.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, any participant in on-the-job training who becomes ineligible for aid under this chapter due to earned income or hours worked, shall remain a participant in the program under this article for the duration of the on-the-job training assignment and shall be eligible for supportive services for the duration of the on-the-job training, provided this duration does not exceed the time limits otherwise applicable to the recipient.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, any participant in on-the-job training, grant-based on-the-job training, supported work, or transitional employment who remains eligible for aid pursuant to this chapter, shall be eligible for transportation and ancillary expenses pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 11323.2.

(e) (1) Participants shall be encouraged to apply for financial aid, including educational grants, scholarships, and awards.

(2) To the extent permitted by federal law, the county shall coordinate with financial aid offices to establish procedures whereby the educational expenses of participants are met through available financial aid and the supportive services described in Section 11323.2. These procedures shall not result in duplication of payments, and shall require determinations to be made on an individual basis to ensure that using financial aid will not prevent the person’s participation in their welfare-to-work plan.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10850, for purposes of childcare supportive services, county welfare departments shall share information necessary for the
 administration of the childcare programs and the CalWORKs program.

(2) By January 1, 2028, or the date that automation changes occur, as required for implementation of this section, in the Statewide Automated Welfare System, whichever date is later, a county welfare department shall provide limited, read-only, online access through individual county-level Statewide Automated Welfare System (SAWS) databases to local contractors providing CalWORKs childcare services. Access provided pursuant to this paragraph shall include a single summary page that contains current individual family data needed to enroll a family in CalWORKs childcare services or to transfer a family between stages. This data shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following items, if applicable:

(A) All of the information required in subdivision (a) of Section 18409 of Title 5 of the
 California Code of Regulations, or any successor regulation thereto, and all of the following:

(i) The relationship between the current or former CalWORKs recipient or recipients and the child.

(ii) The childcare license number, if the childcare provider is licensed.

(iii) Whether the current or former CalWORKs recipient is receiving Medi-Cal or CalFresh benefits.

(B) If the family is no longer receiving CalWORKs cash aid, the date that a parent or adult caretaker last received CalWORKs cash aid.

(3) Paragraph (2) does not supersede any agreement between a county and a CalWORKs childcare contractor that was in effect on January 1, 2020, and provides for online access via the legacy Statewide Automated Welfare System to the data described in that paragraph.

(4) Beginning January 1, 2021, or the date that automation changes occur, as required for implementation of this section, in the Statewide Automated Welfare System, whichever date is later, a county welfare department shall provide to stage-two contractors on a monthly basis a report of all families for which the parent’s cash aid has been discontinued, the parent has not received aid for at least one month, and the parent has
 children in the home who are eligible for childcare services. The report shall include the parent’s most up-to-date contact information. The report shall be jointly designed with representatives from the department, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, and Parent Voices, in consultation with county welfare departments and SAWS.

(5) A county welfare department may provide training on security protocols and confidentiality of individual family data to a contractor who is given access to data pursuant to this subdivision.

(6) This subdivision is not intended to limit the information shared for the administration of childcare in addition to the data described in paragraph (2).

(7) After consultation with stakeholders, the department shall issue an all-county letter or similar directive by November 1,
 2019, to implement paragraphs (2) to (6), inclusive, until regulations are adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 38.   (AB 150)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11323.6.

The department shall be responsible for supervising the provision of child care by counties during stage one as described in Sections 8350, 8351, and 8352 of the Education Code. Counties may contract with public and private child care entities or providers for this purpose.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 93.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11323.8.

Counties shall manage the participant’s transition from stage one to stage two child care pursuant to Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 8350) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of the Education Code. If the county is operating stage two child care, the county shall manage the participant’s transition from stage two to stage three pursuant to Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 8350) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of the Education Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 95.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11323.9.

Each county welfare department shall provide to the State Department of Social Services, on a monthly basis, data regarding child care usage and demand in stage one of child care services, as described in Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 8350) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of the Education Code, through which a recipient of aid under this chapter, or any successor program, will pass. The specific information needed for these reports may be specified by the Department of Social Services or through provisions of the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 750, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11324.

(a) If the county welfare department or a contractor pays for child care services which are exempt from licensure, all of the following information about the caregiver shall be on file with the county welfare department or the contractor and shall be made available to the participant:

(1) The name and address of the care provider. 

(2) The address where care is to be provided. 

(3) The hours care is to be provided and the charge for this care. 

(4) The names, addresses, and telephone numbers of two character references. 

(5) A copy of a valid California driver’s license or other identification to establish that the caregiver is at least 18 years old. 

(6) A statement from the caregiver as to his or her health education, experience or other qualification, criminal record, and names and ages of other persons in the home or providing care. 

(b) The county welfare department or the contractor shall use existing child care licensing or CalWORKs program procedures in meeting the requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) To the extent permitted by federal law, the county welfare department shall deny payment, or cause the contractor to deny payment, for child care services which are exempt from licensure if either of the following apply:

(1) The provider has been convicted of a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code. 

(2) The provider has been convicted of child abuse. 

(d) If the child care provider selected by the participant is denied payment, the participant may have good cause for not participating as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 11320.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 96.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11324.4.

(a) The employer or sponsor of an employment or training program position described in Section 11322.6 or 11322.9 or any positions created under any county pilot project shall assist and encourage qualified participants to compete for job openings occurring within the sponsor’s organization for which they qualify.

(b) Workers assigned to public agencies shall be allowed to participate in classified service examinations equivalent to the positions they occupy, as well as all
 open and promotional examinations for which experience in the position or other relevant experience is qualifying under merit system rules. To the extent permitted under federal or state law, local ordinance, or applicable collective bargaining agreements, time worked in the positions shall apply toward seniority in the merit public agency positions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 98.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11324.5.

The county shall ensure that the labor union is notified of the use of participants assigned to an employment or training program position described in Section 11322.6 or 11322.9 or any positions created under any county pilot project, in any location or work activity controlled by an employer and covered by a collective bargaining agreement between the employer and a union. For nonunionized employees, procedures shall provide for notification to employees of the use of participants under this article and the availability of the grievance process. Display of a
 poster shall satisfy this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 99.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11324.6.

Any employment or training program position described in subdivisions (a) to (l), inclusive, of Section 11322.6 or Section 11322.9 or under any county pilot project, shall not be created as a result of, or shall not result in, any of the following:

(a) Displacement or partial displacement of current employees, including, but not limited to, a reduction in hours of nonovertime and overtime work, wages, or employment benefits.

(b) The filling of positions which would otherwise be promotional opportunities for current employees, except when positions are to be filled through an open process in which recipients are provided equal opportunity to compete.

(c) The filling of a position, prior to compliance with applicable personnel procedures or provisions of collective bargaining agreements.

(d) The filling of established unfilled public agency positions, unless the positions are unfunded in a public agency budget.

(e) The filling of a position created by termination, layoff, or reduction in workforce, caused by the employer’s intent to fill the position with a subsidized position pursuant to this article.

(f) A strike, lockout, or other bona fide labor dispute, or
 violation of any existing collective bargaining agreement between employees and employers.

(g) The filling of a work assignment customarily performed by a worker in a job classification within a recognized collective bargaining unit in that specific worksite, or the filling of a work assignment in any bargaining unit in which funded positions are vacant or in which regular employees are on layoff.

(h) The termination of a contract for services, prior to its expiration date, that results in the displacement or partial displacement of workers performing contracted services, caused by the employer’s intent to fill the position with a subsidized position pursuant to this article.

(i) The filling of a work assignment that results in not rehiring a seasonal employee who has a history of regular seasonal employment with an
 employer. The provisions of this subdivision shall apply only to the construction industry.

(j) The denial to a participant or employee of protections afforded other workers on the worksite by state and federal laws governing workplace health, safety, and representation.

(k) Subdivisions (b), (d), and (g) shall not apply to unsubsidized employment placements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1142, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11324.7.

(a) The department shall provide a grievance process for regular employees and their representatives who wish to file a complaint that an assignment to community service, work experience, on-the-job training, or any activity funded by grant-based on-the-job training violates any of the displacement provisions contained in Section 11324.6, as applicable, respecting any employment or training position created pursuant to this article.

(b) (1) The grievance
 process established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall consist of an informal procedure followed by a hearing if the informal procedure fails to resolve the complaint to the satisfaction of the complainant.

(2) The grievance and any available appeal process shall be conducted in accordance with rules and notification requirements adopted and promulgated in federal law.

(3) The department shall issue instructions and requirements for the grievance process.

(c) The department shall administer the employee grievance process either directly or through the county welfare departments, or may enter into agreements with another state agency to administer all or any part of the grievance process.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), the department shall
 require the use of any existing grievance procedure that is part of a collective bargaining agreement between the employer and the labor union representing the regular employee, in lieu of the process established by this section.

(e) Remedies for complaining regular employees in the process established by this section shall include, where appropriate, reinstatement, retroactive pay, and retroactive benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11324.8.

(a) At the time an individual applies for aid under this chapter, or at the time a recipient’s eligibility for aid is determined, the county shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide the individual, in writing and orally as necessary, with at least the following program information:

(A) A general description of the education, employment, and training opportunities and the supportive services available, including
 transitional benefits.

(B) A description of the exemptions from required participation provided under this article and the consequences of a refusal to participate in program components, if not exempt.

(C) A description of the responsibility of the participant to cooperate in establishing paternity and enforcing child support obligations, and to assist individuals in establishing paternity and obtaining child support as a condition of eligibility.

(2) Determine whether the individual is required to participate in the program provided under this article.

(b) At the time an individual is required to participate pursuant to this article, he or she shall receive a written preliminary determination that he or she is a member of a targeted group, for purposes
 of any applicable and operative federal Targeted Jobs Tax Credit and California Jobs Tax Credit.

(c) Persons not required to participate may volunteer to participate.

(d) An applicant for, or a recipient of, aid who is dissatisfied with the provisions of the welfare-to-work plan may seek redress through the independent assessment process, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 11325.4 or the state hearing or county grievance process, as described in Section 11327.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.1.

When child care services are provided by a program funded under Section 8481 of the Education Code to a recipient under this article or any other job training program for recipients under this chapter, and the job training program utilizes vouchers for child care services issued by the county or a contracting agency, reimbursement for those child care services shall be made at a market rate established by the State Department of Education pursuant to Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 8350) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 902, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.15.

(a) (1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the Online CalWORKs Appraisal Tool (OCAT) is an essential part of CalWORKs welfare-to-work case management and should function as a shared service in the Statewide Automated Welfare System (SAWS), which is the system of record for the CalWORKs program, as expeditiously as possible.

(2) The State Department of Social Services shall expedite any necessary steps to obtain any necessary licenses to allow the OCAT to function as a shared service in the SAWS environment.

(b) OCAT shall become a shared service in the SAWS environment, consistent with the state’s shared services strategy. The functionality of
 OCAT in the SAWS environment shall include, but not be limited to, the exchange of data to prevent the need for duplicate data entry, to alert users to potential data conflicts, and to transmit OCAT recommendations to SAWS, where the recommendations may be used to streamline the case management of welfare-to-work activities and to produce reports. 

(c) The implementation of this section shall not reduce access by the department nor counties to OCAT data and recommendations, as that access existed as of June 30, 2017.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts necessary to obtain licenses for OCAT shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts necessary to obtain licenses for OCAT shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 20.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Conditionally superseded on or after July 1, 2026; See amendment by Stats. 2025, Ch. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.15.

(a) (1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the Online CalWORKs Appraisal Tool (OCAT) is an essential part of CalWORKs welfare-to-work case management and should function as a shared service in the Statewide Automated Welfare System (SAWS), which is the system of record for the CalWORKs program, as expeditiously as possible.

(2) The State Department of Social Services shall expedite any necessary steps to obtain any necessary licenses to allow the OCAT to function as a shared service in the SAWS environment.

(b) OCAT shall become a shared service in the SAWS environment, consistent with the state’s shared services strategy. The functionality of OCAT in the SAWS
 environment shall include, but not be limited to, the exchange of data to prevent the need for duplicate data entry, to alert users to potential data conflicts, and to transmit OCAT recommendations to SAWS, where the recommendations may be used to streamline the case management of welfare-to-work activities and to produce reports.

(c) The implementation of this section shall not reduce access by the department nor counties to OCAT data and recommendations, as that access existed as of June 30, 2017.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law,
 a contract awarded pursuant to this article
 shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual and is not subject to review or approval by the Department of General Services.

(e) Consistent with Section 11325.2, the department shall develop an updated streamlined appraisal tool to replace OCAT. This tool shall be designed to improve efficiency while maintaining the ability to assess participant strengths and barriers. The department shall convene a stakeholder workgroup, which may be convened concurrently with an existing department stakeholder meeting, to inform the development and use of this tool. The stakeholder workgroup shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of organizations representing the County Welfare Directors Association of California, CalWORKs recipients, social workers, advocacy groups, and any relevant state, county, or city government agencies. The department shall ensure that, in replacing OCAT, the lines of inquiry necessary to support participants are retained in the appraisal tool, including, but not limited to, domestic violence, learning disabilities, and pregnant or parenting
 teenagers.

(f) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(g) The changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026, or, if automation is necessary, the later of July 1, 2026, or on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to
 implement the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 13) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 107, Sec. 4.   (SB 146)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.2.

(a) At the time a recipient enters the welfare-to-work program, the county shall conduct an appraisal, pursuant to regulations adopted by the department, during which the recipient is informed of the requirement to participate in allowable welfare-to-work activities and of the provision of supportive services, pursuant to Section 11323.2. The appraisal shall gather and provide information about the recipient in the following areas:

(1) Employment history, interests, and skills.

(2) Educational history and learning disabilities.

(3) Housing status and stability.

(4) Language barriers.

(5) Physical and behavioral health, including, but not limited to, mental health and substance abuse issues.

(6) Child physical and behavioral health and well-being.

(7) Criminal background that may present a barrier to employment or housing stability.

(8) Domestic violence.

(9) Need for supportive services described in Section 11323.2.

(10) Other information that may affect an individual’s ability
 to participate in work activities.

(11) The recipient’s determination of their skills, prior work experience, and employability. The recipient may indicate that they would like assistance with this determination. The recipient may request assistance with completing any portion of the appraisal.

(b) (1) The county shall utilize a standardized appraisal tool in order to assess strengths for and barriers to work activities. This tool shall be developed or selected by the department, in consultation with stakeholders, and shall be customized as needed for statewide use.

(2) (A) Upon
 completion of the development of the updated streamlined appraisal tool developed pursuant to Section 11325.15, the county shall utilize the updated streamlined appraisal tool.

(B) This paragraph shall become operative on July 1, 2026, or, if automation is necessary, the later of July 1, 2026, or on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph.

(3) Concurrent with the development of the standardized appraisal tool, mandatory training shall be developed for administration
 of the tool and shall, in addition, include skill-building components, including, at a minimum, rapport building and interviewing techniques.

(c) (1) If the results of the appraisal indicate that the individual may face barriers that impair
 their ability to participate in work activities, the county shall refer the recipient for an evaluation and services as described in Section 11325.25, 11325.5, or 11325.8, or may refer the recipient to family stabilization pursuant to Section 11325.24.

(2) If information obtained from the appraisal indicates that the individual qualifies for an exemption from welfare-to-work requirements, the county shall apply the exemption, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11320.3.

(d) This section shall not apply to individuals subject to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 11331) during the time that article is operative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 14.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.21.

(a) Any individual who is required to participate in welfare-to-work activities pursuant to this article shall enter into a written welfare-to-work plan with the county welfare department after assessment, as required by subdivision (c) of Section 11320.1, but no more than 90 days after the date that a recipient’s eligibility for aid is determined or the date the recipient is required to participate in welfare-to-work activities pursuant to Section 11320.3. The recipient and the county may enter into a welfare-to-work plan as late as 90 days after the completion of the job search activity, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11320.1, if the job search activity is initiated within 30 days after the recipient’s eligibility for aid is determined. The plan shall include the activities and services that will move the individual into employment.

(b) The county shall allow the participant three working days after completion of the plan or subsequent amendments to
 the plan in which to evaluate and request changes to the terms of the plan.

(c) The plan shall be written in clear and understandable language, and have a simple and easy-to-read format.

(d) The plan shall contain at least all of the following general information:

(1) A general description of the program provided for in this article, including available program components and supportive services.

(2) A general description of the rights, duties, and responsibilities of program participants, including a list of the exemptions from the required participation under this article, the consequences of a refusal to participate in program components, and criteria for successful completion of the program.

(3) A description of the grace period required in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 11325.22.

(e) (1) The plan shall specify, and shall be amended to reflect changes in, the participant’s welfare-to-work activity, a description of services to be provided in accordance with Sections 11322.6, 11322.8, and 11322.85, as needed, and specific requirements for successful completion of assigned activities, including required hours of participation.

(2) The plan shall also include a general description of supportive services pursuant to Section 11323.2 that are to be provided as necessary for the participant to complete assigned program activities.

(f) Any assignment to a program component shall be reflected in the plan or an amendment to the plan. The
 participant shall maintain satisfactory progress toward employment through the methods set forth in the plan, and the county shall provide the services pursuant to Section 11323.2.
